Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 8. Voluntary Admission for Treatment.

Sec. 47.30.670.
Criteria for voluntary admission.

A person 18 years of age or older may be voluntarily admitted to a treatment facility if the person is suffering from mental illness and voluntarily signs the admission papers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.675.
Required notices.

Upon the application of a person for voluntary admission, or at the time a person admitted under AS

47.30.690

reaches the age of 18, the person shall be given a copy of the following documents which shall be explained as necessary:

notice of rights as set out in AS

47.30.825

—

47.30.865

and an explanation of any document served upon the person; and

notice that should the person desire to leave at a time when the treatment facility determines that the person is mentally ill and as a result is likely to cause serious harm to self or others or is gravely disabled, the facility could initiate commitment proceedings against the person.

If an applicant for voluntary admission does not understand English, the explanation shall be given in a language the applicant understands.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.680.
Required discharge.

A patient who no longer meets the standards established in AS

47.30.670

shall be discharged from the treatment facility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981)

Sec. 47.30.685.
Request to leave; evaluation; 48-hour hold for commitment.

A voluntary patient who is 18 years of age or older and who desires to leave a treatment facility shall submit to the facility a request to leave on a form provided by the facility.
When the investigation is completed, the patient shall be evaluated immediately in writing and discharged immediately or given written notice that involuntary commitment proceedings will be initiated against the patient. The treatment facility may detain the patient for no more than 48 hours after receipt of the patient’s request to leave in order to initiate involuntary commitment proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.690.
Admission of minors under 18 years of age.

A minor under the age of 18 may be admitted for 30 days of evaluation, diagnosis, and treatment at a designated treatment facility if the minor’s parent or guardian signs the admission papers and if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge,

the minor is gravely disabled or is suffering from mental illness and as a result is likely to cause serious harm to the minor or others;

there is no less restrictive alternative available for the minor’s treatment; and

there is reason to believe that the minor’s mental condition could be improved by the course of treatment or would deteriorate further if untreated.

A guardian ad litem for a minor admitted under this section shall be appointed under AS

25.24.310

to monitor the best interests of the minor as soon as possible after the minor’s admission. If the guardian ad litem finds that placement is not appropriate, the guardian ad litem may request that an attorney be appointed under AS

25.24.310

to represent the minor. The attorney may request a hearing on behalf of the minor during the 30-day admittance.

The minor may be released by the treatment facility at any time if the professional person in charge or the minor’s designated mental health professional determines the minor would no longer benefit from continued treatment and the minor is not dangerous. The minor’s parents or guardian must be notified by the facility of the contemplated release.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.693.
Notice to parent or guardian of minor.

When a minor under 18 years of age is detained at or admitted or committed to a treatment facility, the facility shall inform the parent or guardian of the location of the minor as soon as possible after the arrival of the minor at the facility.

History.

(§ 6 ch 142 SLA 1984)

Sec. 47.30.695.
Request by parent or guardian for release of minors under 18 years of age from detention and commitment.

The parent or guardian of a minor who is less than 18 years of age may file a notice to withdraw the minor from the facility. On receipt of the notice,

the facility may discharge the minor to the custody of the parent or guardian; or

if, in the opinion of the treating physician, release of the minor would be seriously detrimental to the minor’s health, the treating physician may

discharge the minor to the custody of the parent or guardian after advising the parent or guardian that this action is against medical advice and after receiving a written acknowledgment of the advice; or

refuse to discharge the minor, initiate involuntary commitment proceedings, and continue to hold the minor until a court order under AS

47.30.700

has been issued; or

if, in the opinion of the treating physician, the minor is likely to cause serious harm to self or others and there is reason to believe the release could place the minor in imminent danger, the treating physician shall refuse to discharge the minor, and shall initiate involuntary commitment proceedings and continue to hold the minor until a court order under AS

47.30.700

has been issued.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1981; am § 7 ch 142 SLA 1984; am § 28 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 10, 2010, moved “the facility may” from the introductory language to the beginning of (1); in (2)(A), substituted “acknowledgment” for “acknowledgement”.